Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1945
Creditor's action against member.

(a) No proceeding may be brought by a creditor to reach the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceeding would be useless.

(b) All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any creditor's proceeding brought under subsection (a) of this section to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation. Any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such proceeding.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 45.